epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/et.xml
		2s3õli
		3sõlm
		3sõn
		2s1õp
		5sõr
		sõsa4
		2s3õu
		1sö
		4söd
		sö2k
		2sön
		1sä
		4säk
		4säm
		1sü
		4süa
		5süd
		5süg
		2süh
		s3ühi
		2sük
		s3üks
		sü4la
		sül5di
		sü3lem
		4sülo
		sü4ra
		3süs
		3süü
		4sž
		1ta
		3ta.
		3taat.
		2tabi
		4t3aed
		t3aine
		4tais
		4ta4ko
		t2al
		4ta4laj
		ta4lev
		tal4las
		ta3lu
		ta4lus
		3tam
		5tama
		4tanda
		ta4ot
		ta4pla
		ta4pr
		4ta4ret
		4tarm
		2tart
		ta4se4r
		ta4ses
		ta4set
		ta4sis
		ta4sü
		2taut
		3tav
		ta4vaj
		2t1b4
		2td2
		1t2e
		te4aa
		tea4g
		tea4h
		te3an
		te5as
		3tee
		tee5lu
		te4et
		te3hi
		tehi4s
		te3kl
		tek4r
		tek4v
		tel4ke
		te4lok
		te3lu.
		4tepiv
		tep4l
		2tepp
		3ter
		5ter.
		te5r4a
		terd4
		4terg
		ters4
		tes4a
		te4sin
		tes4k
		2t1f
		4t1g4
		2t1h
		thõl4
		3ti
		tia2
		ti3e
		tii2k
		tii4ma
		tii4sa
		tii4ve
		tik4o
		ti3k4r
		tik4vi
		4tilm
		5tima
		4tinf
		tin4ga
		ti4sai
		tisa4v
		ti4sik
		titee4
		2t1j
		2t1k2
		t3kl
		t3kr
		2t1l4
		tlu4
		2t1m
		tmika4
		tmis3
		2t1n
		3t2o
		4to4da
		toen4
		tog6
		4toks.
		toksi5k
		to4lek
		to4lu.
		to4lum
		tonis4
		to4o
		too4no
		too4pe
		to4rau
		tos4p
		tost4
		2t3p4
		2t1r
		t4rad
		t2raf
		3trafo
		t4rahh
		5trall
		t2ran
		3trans
		t4rate
		5traum
		t2re
		3treen
		t4rei
		5treim
		3trep
		t3rig
		5triib
		5triip
		5trikoo.
		tri4pl
		t4ross
		3trumm
		5t4rup
		3t2ruu
		3t2rü
		4trüü
		2t1s
		t3s2a
		ts4aa
		tsa5is
		t4saju
		tsa4lan
		3tsehh
		tse3la
		5tsellu
		5tsemen
		4tsena
		5tsensu
		tsig4
		5tsiitsi
		t4sink
		5tsiste
		ts4laa
		t2soo
		t4sor
		tsp4
		t4suss
		2t1t
		t4tad
		ttee2
		ttes2
		t5tsem
		3tu
		4tuim
		tu4raj
		tus1a
		tu4s5ee
		tu2si
		tus3s
		4t5uss.
		tus3t2
		tu5su
		tu4sä4
		tusü4
		4tutop
		4tuud
		tuule5
		2t1v
		1tõ
		5tõb
		2tõi
		tõ4l
		4tõ4n
		4tõp
		2t5õun
		1tö
		4töe
		4tök
		töö5k
		töö3p
		1tä
		täh4t3a
		tä5ke
		4täm
		1tü
		tü5he.
		tü3hi
		2t1ž
		t2že
		5tžek
		3tžem
		uaa4
		u3aast
		ua2b
		u5abi
		u1ae
		ua4he
		uai4k
		u3ain
		ua2ja
		u3akt
		ua2l
		u3all
		u3amet
		u1an
		ua4nu
		u5apar
		ua2re
		ua5ree
		u5art
		ua2s
		u3ast
		u1au
		uau4d
		ua2v
		u5avald
		u1b
		u4dalu
		u4deh
		udeo4
		udo4r
		u5eal
		u3eel
		u3eks
		ue2ma
		ueo4
		ue4r
		u1f
		u1g
		u4gi4d
		ug2ra
		u5graa
		u4gü
		uh4tem
		uh4ter
		uh4tin
		uh4tis
		uidu5
		ui2ga
		ui4h
		u3iha
		u3ilm
		5uim.
		uina2
		uinas5
		ui4si
		3uisut
		uite4h
		ui4to
		ui4vala
		ui4vel
		ui4vo
		u1j
		u5ja
		u4juj
		u4jum
		3ujumi
		u1k
		ukaa4s
		ukii4g
		ukki5
		ukop4
		u3kraa
		u5kro
		uku4sa
		uk4vi
		ul4a
		ul4deh
		uldi4
		ul4kr
		ul4len
		ul4lui
		ultra5
		u3lu
		uluo4
		4u1m
		umaf4
		u4mau
		5umbroh
		umet4
		umf4
		umia4
		umit4
		um5p4r
		unaa4
		unaal5
		un4dak
		un4dan
		un4das
		un4do
		u4ni.
		u1o2
		uo4h
		u2or
		u3org
		u1p
		u3pla
		up3le
		uppe4
		up4pis
		uraa4l
		u4rag
		ura4ju
		u4rala
		u4rap
		ur5auk
		ura4va
		3urb.
		urde3
		urea4
		u4reos
		ures4k
		u4rett
		urgas4
		5urge.
		u4ri4met
		u4rini
		uris4k
		urka4v
		uro4r
		u4rulu
		u2sa2
		u5sa.
		usad4
		u4sae
		u4salu
		us5aste
		u3sea
		useg4
		us5elek
		u4sett
		u3setu
		u5sev
		us4fä
		us5g
		u4si4d
		usi4g
		u4si4h
		us5ind
		usi4va
		us3kr
		u2so
		us5o2h
		us3ole
		uso4r
		us3p4
		u3s4por
		usui4
		3usuli
		u4suss
		u2sõ
		u2sü
		us3üh
		u1t
		ut4kl
		utos2
		utot4
		ut4ru
		ut4so
		utt4r
		utu4s
		utü4h
		uu5al
		4uud
		uu4du.
		uu4kak
		uuk5ri
		uu4mal
		uu4mis
		uu4pü
		uu4ran
		uu4ras
		uu4rau
		uu4rav
		uu3sa
		uusa3k
		uus4ke
		u3uss.
		uu4sul
		4uut
		uu4tas
		uu4tis
		uu4tüh
		u5uuri
		u1v
		u4vau
		u1õ2
		uä2
		u3är
		u1ü2
		už4l
		vaa4re4
		va4as
		4vabi
		vae4r
		vag4
		va5he
		4vaia
		4v3ain
		vak4v
		va4la.
		va4lai
		4valdi
		val4ga4
		va4lü
		vana5i
		vane2
		4vanku
		van4ta
		van4te
		vap4r
		v4ar
		4varm
		var4p
		2vart
		4varuh
		4varve
		va4sas
		vas4k
		vast4r
		vat4r
		4vatud
		vau4d
		vav4
		4vb
		2v1d
		3ve
		vee3a
		vee3k
		vee5la
		vee3sp
		4vehi
		vei4sa
		ve4ol
		veot4
		ve4rah
		ves4p
		2vf
		2vg4
		2v1h
		3vi
		via2
		vid4
		4videa
		vip4
		vi3pl
		vir4k
		vi4sak
		vis4ko4d
		2v1j
		2v1k
		2v1l
		2v1m
		2v1n
		voo5lu
		2v5p
		2v1r
		2v1s
		2v1t2
		v3tr
		vu4sa
		vu4su4
		2v1v
		3võ
		4võig
		4võ4li
		4võm
		võr4k5
		3vä
		vää4re4
		vää4ru
		3zo
		zook4
		zoos4
		õ1b
		õbe3
		õ1d
		õea4
		õe4lan
		õe3lu
		õet2
		õeu4
		õ1g
		õh4vu
		õi4a
		õi4b
		õie5k
		3õiel
		3õigu
		õi4ko
		õise4
		õi4su4
		õ1j
		õk4kõ
		õl2d
		õ4lim
		õ4lit
		õl4mad
		3õmbl
		õnet4s
		õ2p
		õ3pa
		õpi5e
		õp2pa
		4õp3r
		õranda5
		õra4s
		õr4da
		õr4gaa
		õr4gar
		õr4go
		4õs
		õs4a
		õ4tü4
		õude3
		õ1v4
		õõ5p
		õõre4
		õõ4rel
		õõ4ta
		öa2
		ö1b
		ö1d
		5ö2dee
		ödi4k
		3öeld
		öep4
		öet4r
		ö1g4
		ö1h
		öi4a
		öi4g
		öi4s
		ö1j
		ö1k
		ö2kon
		3ökono
		ök4v
		ö1l
		öli2s
		ölis5a
		ö1m
		öo2
		ö2p3au
		öp4lu
		ö4raa
		ö4rau
		ör4da
		ör4dell
		ör4e
		ö4ri4l
		ö4ro4
		ö4rä
		ö4rül
		ös4tii
		ö4to4
		ö4tü4
		ö1v
		ö3õ
		öö3a
		öö3e4
		öö5i
		3öölan
		öö3o
		ööt4r
		öü4
		äa4
		ä1b
		äbus5
		äbut4
		ä1d
		äe3a4
		äe1o
		ä1g
		äga4ri
		ähe5a
		äidi4s
		äike3
		äi4lo
		äi4lu
		äi2s
		äisa4
		äi4sõ
		äi4tar
		ä3j
		ä2ke
		3äke.
		ä5ker
		ä4kõ
		äli2s
		äl4ko
		5ämbl
		ä4nah
		än4deo
		änet4
		än4to4
		äok4
		ä4ra5a
		ära3o4
		ä4rar
		äre4lis
		äret4
		ärge4l
		ärii4
		äri4kl
		äri4sel
		ä4riste
		är4kar
		ä4ro
		5ärrit
		är4ta
		är2va
		ä4rõ
		äs4ko
		äs4nai
		äs4p
		äs4san
		äs4so
		ät4ri
		äu4d
		ä1v
		ävee4
		ää4kin
		ääo4
		ää4rase
		5ääris.
		üaa4
		ü1b
		üdame5
		ü1g
		ü2h
		ühe5i4
		1ühen
		3ühik.
		ü3hit
		ü1j
		ükan4
		ük4kas
		ük3l
		ül2d
		üld5a2
		ü2le
		3ülek
		ü5lel
		üle4mas
		1üles
		ülesä4
		ül4gav
		ül4gee
		ü4lih
		ülii4
		3üliko
		ü4liõ
		ül5kl
		ül5la
		ül4mei
		ülo4r
		ülp4
		ült4
		üma4rak
		üma4ru
		ümi4ko
		ü5ne
		üni4s
		üot4
		üp3l
		üp5p4
		üp3r
		üpsu4
		ürd4
		ürik4
		üs4o
		üs4pr
		üs4tal
		üs4tas
		üta4r
		ütee4l
		5ütlev
		ü4t3r
		üt4ru
		ü1v
		ü4ü
		üü2l3a2
		üü4le
		üü4lo
		üü4pe
		1ža
		4žb
		1že
		5žee
		5žer
		4žf
		1ži
		4žj
		4žk
		4žl
		4žm
		4žn
		3žo
		4žp
		4žt
		5žö
		5žü
		2žž
		3ša
		4šak
		4šau
		1še
		3š4i
		šis4k
		4šk
		5šo
		4št
		3šu4
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
